New York, session 2025-2026, A8478.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 20 of the laws of 1998, amending the 2 education law relating to the provision of physical therapy assistant 3 services in public and private primary and secondary schools, as amended 4 by section 1 of item W of subpart B of part XXX of chapter 58 of the 5 laws of 2020, is amended to read as follows: 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall remain in effect 7 until June 30, [2025] 2030 when upon such date the provisions of this 8 act shall expire and be deemed repealed. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13004-01-5